New York, session 2025-2026, A7907.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (i) of subdivision 4 of section 214 of the elder 2 law is amended to read as follows: 3 (i) The director, within the amounts appropriated therefor and with 4 the approval of the director of the budget, may authorize a county which 5 has an approved home care plan for functionally impaired elderly to 6 provide expanded non-medical in-home services, non-institutional respite 7 services, case management services, and ancillary services pursuant to 8 such plan. Such services shall be limited to those services necessary to 9 meet otherwise unmet needs and which support such elderly persons' 10 continued residence in their homes. Needs will be determined pursuant to 11 a standardized evaluation of functional impairment, available resources 12 and such other relevant factors specified pursuant to regulations 13 promulgated by the director. Agencies providing expanded non-medical 14 in-home services, non-institutional respite services, case management 15 services, and ancillary services pursuant to such plan shall not need a 16 prescription or physician's order to provide such services. No expanded 17 non-medical in-home services, non-institutional respite services, or 18 ancillary services shall be provided to any individual pursuant to this 19 section unless such expanded non-medical in-home services, non-institu- 20 tional respite services, or ancillary services are accompanied by ongo- 21 ing case management services in accordance with regulations promulgated 22 by the director. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11452-01-5 A. 7907 2 1 § 2. Paragraph (k) of subdivision 4 of section 214 of the elder law is 2 REPEALED. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 4 have become a law.